Alabama, session 2026rs, HB465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For purposes of this section, the term
"invisible disability" means a physical or mental condition
that may interfere with an individual's ability to communicate
with a first responder, including:
(1) A communication impediment;
(2) Hearing loss;
(3) Blindness or a visual impairment;
(4) Autism spectrum disorder;
(5) Traumatic brain injury;
(6) Schizophrenia;
(7) Alzheimer's disease or dementia;
(8) Post traumatic stress disorder;
(9) Epilepsy;
(10) A developmental disability;
(11) Down syndrome;
(12) Diabetes;
(13) A heart condition; or
(14) A cognitive disability.
(b) An owner of a motor vehicle who is a resident of
Alabama and who has been diagnosed with an invisible
disability or an individual who is the primary caretaker of an
Page 1

disability or an individual who is the primary caretaker of an
HB465 Enrolled
individual who has been diagnosed with an invisible disability
shall be issued a license plate of the individual's choosing
and a "Invisible Disability" license plate decal upon:
(1) Application to the judge of probate, license
commissioner, or other issuing official;
(2) Compliance with motor vehicle registration and
licensing laws;
(3) Payment of regular fees required by law for license
plates for private passenger or pleasure motor vehicles.
(4) Payment of any additional fees required by law for
distinctive license plates, should the individual seek to be
issued a distinctive license plate; and
(5) Presentation of a diagnosis from a physician
licensed to practice medicine in this state as proof of
eligibility.
(c) The validity of the "Invisible Disability" license
plate decals shall coincide with the reissuance of the
registrant's license plate as provided in Section 32-6-62,
Code of Alabama 1975.
(d) Payment of required license fees and taxes for the
years during which a new plate is not issued shall be
evidenced as provided in Section 32-6-63, Code of Alabama
1975.
(e) Kulturecity, Incorporated shall be responsible for
the design of the license plate decal subject to approval by
the Commissioner of Revenue and compliance with all laws and
rules.
(f) The "Invisible Disability" decal provided by this
Page 2

(f) The "Invisible Disability" decal provided by this
HB465 Enrolled
section shall not qualify the individual to be parked in
special access parking as provided in Sections 40-12-300 and
32-6-231, Code of Alabama 1975, unless the individual has been
issued a disability distinctive special access plate or
placard as provided for in those sections.
(g) The Department of Revenue may adopt rules to
implement this section.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on January
1, 2027.
Page 3

1, 2027.
HB465 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 03-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 07-Apr-26 Passed


100
Page 4